California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
 not to intervene and participate in the appeal. This statement may be in the form of an annual report to the Legislature and Judicial Council and that report shall be a matter of public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 259, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

903.

In the event of the death of any person who would, if still alive, have a right of appeal, either the attorney of record representing the decedent in the court in which the judgment was rendered, or the executor or administrator of the estate of the decedent, may file a notice of appeal therefrom within the time within which the decedent could have filed such a notice if he had survived.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

904.

An appeal may be taken in a civil action or proceeding as provided in Sections 904.1, 904.2, 904.3, and 904.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 9.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

904.1.

(a) An appeal, other than in a limited civil case, is to the court of appeal. An appeal, other than in a limited civil case, may be taken from any of the following:

(1) From a judgment, except an interlocutory judgment, other than as provided in paragraphs (8), (9), and (11), or a judgment of contempt that is made final and conclusive by Section 1222.

(2) From an order made after a judgment made appealable by paragraph (1).

(3) From an order granting a motion to quash service of summons or granting a motion to stay the action on the ground of inconvenient
 forum, or from a written order of dismissal under Section 581d following an order granting a motion to dismiss the action on the ground of inconvenient forum.

(4) From an order granting a new trial or denying a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict.

(5) From an order discharging or refusing to discharge an attachment or granting a right to attach order.

(6) From an order granting or dissolving an injunction, or refusing to grant or dissolve an injunction.

(7) From an order appointing a receiver.

(8) From an interlocutory judgment, order, or decree, made or entered in an action to redeem real or
 personal property from a mortgage thereof, or a lien thereon, determining the right to redeem and directing an accounting.

(9) From an interlocutory judgment in an action for partition determining the rights and interests of the respective parties and directing partition to be made.

(10) From an order made appealable by the Probate Code or the Family Code.

(11) From an interlocutory judgment directing payment of monetary sanctions by a party or an attorney for a party if the amount exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(12) From an order directing payment of monetary sanctions by a party or an attorney for a party if the amount exceeds five thousand
 dollars ($5,000).

(13) From an order granting or denying a special motion to strike under Sections 425.16 and 425.19.

(14) From a final order or judgment in a bifurcated proceeding regarding child custody or visitation rights.

(b) Sanction orders or judgments of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less against a party or an attorney for a party may be reviewed on an appeal by that party after entry of final judgment in the main action, or, at the discretion of the court of appeal, may be reviewed upon petition for an extraordinary writ.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 779, Sec. 2.   (SB 439)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

904.2.

An appeal of a ruling by a superior court judge or other judicial officer in a limited civil case is to the appellate division of the superior court. An appeal of a ruling by a superior court judge or other judicial officer in a limited civil case may be taken from any of the following:

(a) From a judgment, except (1) an interlocutory judgment, or (2) a judgment of contempt that is made final and conclusive by Section 1222.

(b) From
 an order made after a judgment made appealable by subdivision (a).

(c) From an order changing or refusing to change the place of trial.

(d) From an order granting a motion to quash service of summons or granting a motion to stay the action on the ground of inconvenient forum, or from a written order of dismissal under Section 581d following an order granting a motion to dismiss the action on the ground of inconvenient forum.

(e) From an order granting a new trial or denying a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict.

(f) From an order discharging or refusing to discharge an attachment or granting a right to attach order.

(g) From an order granting or dissolving an injunction, or
 refusing to grant or dissolve an injunction.

(h) From an order appointing a receiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

904.3.

An appeal shall not be taken from a judgment of the appellate division of a superior court granting or denying a petition for issuance of a writ of mandamus or prohibition directed to the superior court, or a judge thereof, in a limited civil case or a misdemeanor or infraction case. An appellate court may, in its discretion, upon petition for extraordinary writ, review the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

904.5.

Appeals from the small claims division of a superior court shall be governed by the Small Claims Act (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 116.110) of Title 1 of Part 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

906.

Upon an appeal pursuant to Section 904.1 or 904.2, the reviewing court may review the verdict or decision and any intermediate ruling, proceeding, order or decision which involves the merits or necessarily affects the judgment or order appealed from or which substantially affects the rights of a party, including, on any appeal from the judgment, any order on motion for a new trial, and may affirm, reverse or modify any judgment or order appealed from and may direct the proper judgment or order to be entered, and may, if necessary or proper, direct a new trial or further proceedings to be had. The respondent, or party in whose favor the judgment was given, may, without
 appealing from such judgment, request the reviewing court to and it may review any of the foregoing matters for the purpose of determining whether or not the appellant was prejudiced by the error or errors upon which he relies for reversal or modification of the judgment from which the appeal is taken. The provisions of this section do not authorize the reviewing court to review any decision or order from which an appeal might have been taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

907.

When it appears to the reviewing court that the appeal was frivolous or taken solely for delay, it may add to the costs on appeal such damages as may be just.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

908.

When the judgment or order is reversed or modified, the reviewing court may direct that the parties be returned so far as possible to the positions they occupied before the enforcement of or execution on the judgment or order. In doing so, the reviewing court may order restitution on reasonable terms and conditions of all property and rights lost by the erroneous judgment or order, so far as such restitution is consistent with rights of third parties and may direct the entry of a money judgment sufficient to compensate for property or rights not restored. The reviewing court may take evidence and make findings concerning such matters or may, by order, refer such matters to
 the trial court for determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

909.

In all cases where trial by jury is not a matter of right or where trial by jury has been waived, the reviewing court may make factual determinations contrary to or in addition to those made by the trial court. The factual determinations may be based on the evidence adduced before the trial court either with or without the taking of evidence by the reviewing court. The reviewing court may for the purpose of making the factual determinations or for any other purpose in the interests of justice, take additional evidence of or concerning facts occurring at any time prior to the decision of the appeal, and may give or direct the entry of any judgment or order
 and may make any further or other order as the case may require. This section shall be liberally construed to the end among others that, where feasible, causes may be finally disposed of by a single appeal and without further proceedings in the trial court except where in the interests of justice a new trial is required on some or all of the issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 900, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

911.

A court of appeal may order any case on appeal to a superior court in its district transferred to it for hearing and decision as provided by rules of the Judicial Council when the superior court certifies, or the court of appeal determines, that the transfer appears necessary to secure uniformity of decision or to settle important questions of law.

No case in which there is a right on appeal to a trial anew in the superior court shall be transferred pursuant to this section before a decision in the case becomes final
 therein.

A court to which any case is transferred pursuant to this section shall have similar power to review any matter and make orders and judgments as the appellate division of the superior court would have in the case, except that if the case was tried anew in the superior court, the court of appeal shall have similar power to review any matter and make orders and judgments as it has in a case appealed pursuant to Section 904.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 103.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

912.

Upon final determination of an appeal by the reviewing court, the clerk of the court shall remit to the trial court a certified copy of the judgment or order of the reviewing court and of its opinion, if any. The clerk of the trial court shall file the certified copy of the judgment and opinion of the reviewing court, shall attach that copy to the judgment roll if the appeal was from a judgment, and shall enter a note of the judgment of the reviewing court stating whether the judgment or order appealed from has been affirmed, reversed or modified, in the margin
 of the original entry of the judgment or order, and also in the register of actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

913.

The dismissal of an appeal shall be with prejudice to the right to file another appeal within the time permitted, unless the dismissal is expressly made without prejudice to another appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

914.

When the right to a phonographic report has not been waived and when it shall be impossible to have a phonographic report of the trial transcribed by a stenographic reporter as provided by law or by rule, because of the death or disability of a reporter who participated as a stenographic reporter at the trial or because of the loss or destruction, in whole or in substantial part, of the notes of such reporter, the trial court or a judge thereof, or the reviewing court shall have power to set aside and vacate the judgment, order or decree from which an appeal has been taken or is to be taken and to order a new trial of the action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Stay of Enforcement and Other Proceedings [916. - 936.1.]

916.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 917.1 to 917.10, inclusive, and in Section 116.810, the perfecting of an appeal stays proceedings in the trial court upon the judgment or order appealed from or upon the matters embraced therein or affected thereby, including enforcement of the judgment or order, but the trial court may proceed upon any other matter embraced in the action and not affected by the judgment or order.

(b) When there is a stay of proceedings other than the enforcement of the judgment, the trial court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings related to the enforcement of the judgment as well as any other matter embraced in the action and not affected by the judgment or order appealed from.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 178, Sec. 2.   (AB 1079)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

917.1.

(a) Unless an undertaking is given, the perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court if the judgment or order is for any of the following:

(1) Money or the payment of money, whether consisting of a special fund or not, and whether payable by the appellant or another party to the action.

(2) Costs awarded pursuant to Section 998 which otherwise would not have
 been awarded as costs pursuant to Section 1033.5.

(3) Costs awarded pursuant to Section 1141.21 which otherwise would not have been awarded as costs pursuant to Section 1033.5.

(b) The undertaking shall be on condition that if the judgment or order or any part of it is affirmed or the appeal is withdrawn or dismissed, the party ordered to pay shall pay the amount of the judgment or order, or the part of it as to which the judgment or order is affirmed, as entered after the receipt of the remittitur, together with any interest which may have accrued pending the appeal and entry of the remittitur, and costs which may be awarded against the appellant on appeal. This section shall not apply in cases where the money to be paid is in the actual or constructive custody of the court; and such cases shall be governed, instead, by the provisions of Section 917.2. The undertaking shall be
 for double the amount of the judgment or order unless given by an admitted surety insurer in which event it shall be for one and one-half times the amount of the judgment or order. The liability on the undertaking may be enforced if the party ordered to pay does not make the payment within 30 days after the filing of the remittitur from the reviewing court.

(c) If a surety on the undertaking pays the judgment, either with or without action, after the judgment is affirmed, the surety is substituted to the rights of the creditor and is entitled to control, enforce, and satisfy the judgment, in all respects as if the surety had recovered the judgment.

(d) Costs awarded by the trial court under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1021) of Title 14 shall be included in the amount of the judgment or order for the purpose of applying paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b).
 However, no undertaking shall be required pursuant to this section solely for costs awarded under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1021) of Title 14.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 456, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

917.15.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court if the judgment or order appealed from, or the administrative order which is the subject of the trial court proceeding, was issued pursuant to either of the following:

(a) Section 78870 of the Health and Safety Code and ordered a responsible party to take appropriate removal or remedial actions in response to a release or a threatened release of a hazardous substance.

(b) Section 25181 of the Health and Safety Code and ordered the party to comply with Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code or any rule, regulation, permit, covenant,
 standard, requirement, or order issued, adopted or executed pursuant to that Chapter 6.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 9.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

917.2.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order of the trial court if the judgment or order appealed from directs the assignment or delivery of personal property, including documents, whether by the appellant or another party to the action, or the sale of personal property upon the foreclosure of a mortgage, or other lien thereon, unless an undertaking in a sum and upon conditions fixed by the trial court, is given that the appellant or party ordered to assign or deliver the property will obey and satisfy the order of the reviewing court, and will not commit or suffer to be committed any damage to the property, and that if the judgment or
 order appealed from is affirmed, or the appeal is withdrawn or dismissed, the appellant shall pay the damage suffered to such property and the value of the use of such property for the period of the delay caused by the appeal. The appellant may cause the property to be placed in the custody of an officer designated by the court to abide the order of the reviewing court, and such fact shall be considered by the court in fixing the amount of the undertaking. If the judgment or order appealed from directs the sale of perishable property the trial court may order such property to be sold and the proceeds thereof to be deposited with the clerk of the trial court to abide the order of the reviewing court; such fact shall be considered by the court in fixing the amount of the undertaking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

917.3.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court if the judgment or order appealed from directs the execution of one or more instruments unless the instrument or instruments are executed and deposited in the office of the clerk of the court where the original judgment or order is entered to abide the order of the reviewing court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

917.4.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court if the judgment or order appealed from directs the sale, conveyance or delivery of possession of real property which is in the possession or control of the appellant or the party ordered to sell, convey or deliver possession of the property, unless an undertaking in a sum fixed by the trial court is given that the appellant or party ordered to sell, convey or deliver possession of the property will not commit or suffer to be committed any waste thereon and that if the judgment or order appealed from is affirmed, or the appeal is withdrawn or dismissed,
 the appellant shall pay the damage suffered by the waste and the value of the use and occupancy of the property, or the part of it as to which the judgment or order is affirmed, from the time of the taking of the appeal until the delivery of the possession of the property. If the judgment or order directs the sale of mortgaged real property and the payment of any deficiency, the undertaking shall also provide for the payment of any deficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

917.5.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court if the judgment or order appealed from appoints a receiver, unless an undertaking in a sum fixed by the trial court is given on condition that if the judgment or order is affirmed or the appeal is withdrawn, or dismissed, the appellant will pay all damages which the respondent may sustain by reason of the stay in the enforcement of the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

917.6.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court if the judgment or order appealed from directs the performance of two or more of the acts specified in Sections 917.1 through 917.5, unless the appellant complies with the requirements of each applicable section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

917.65.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of a right to attach order unless an undertaking is given. The undertaking shall be in the amount specified in the right to attach order as the amount to be secured by the attachment. The undertaking shall be on condition that if the right to attach order is not reversed and the plaintiff recovers judgment in the action in which the right to attach order was issued, the appellant shall pay the amount of the judgment, together with any interest which may have accrued. The liability on the undertaking may be enforced if the judgment is not paid within 30 days after it
 becomes final. If a surety on the undertaking pays the judgment, either with or without action, the surety is substituted to the rights of the creditor and is entitled to control, enforce, and satisfy the judgment, in all respects as if the surety had recovered the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 22.5.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

917.7.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay proceedings as to those provisions of a judgment or order which award, change, or otherwise affect the custody, including the right of visitation, of a minor child in any civil action, in an action filed under the Juvenile Court Law, or in a special proceeding, or the provisions of a judgment or order for the temporary exclusion of a party from a dwelling, as provided in the Family Code. However, the trial court may in its discretion stay execution of these provisions pending review on appeal or for any other period or periods that it may deem appropriate. Further, in the absence of a writ or order of a reviewing court providing otherwise, the provisions of the judgment or order allowing, or eliminating restrictions against, removal of the minor child from the state
 are stayed by operation of law for a period of seven calendar days from the entry of the judgment or order by a juvenile court in a dependency hearing, or for a period of 30 calendar days from the entry of judgment or order by any other trial court. The periods during which these provisions allowing, or eliminating restrictions against, removal of the minor child from the state are stayed, are subject to further stays as ordered by the trial court or by the juvenile court pursuant to this section. An order directing the return of a child to a sister state or country, including any order effectuating that return, made in a proceeding brought pursuant to the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 3400) of Division 8 of the Family Code), the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act of 1980 (28 U.S.C. Sec. 1738A), or the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction (implemented pursuant to the International Child Abduction Remedies Act
 (22 U.S.C. Secs. 9001-9011)) is not a judgment or order which awards, changes, or otherwise affects the custody of a minor child within the meaning of this section, and therefore is not subject to the automatic stay provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 13.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

917.75.

The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order of the trial court awarding attorney’s fees or costs, or both, if the judgment or order appealed from was rendered in a proceeding under the Family Code, unless an undertaking is given in a sum and upon conditions fixed by the trial court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

917.8.

The perfecting of an appeal does not stay proceedings, in the absence of an order of the trial court providing otherwise or of a writ of supersedeas, under any of the following circumstances:

(a) If a party to the proceeding has been adjudged guilty of usurping, or intruding into, or unlawfully holding a public office, civil or military, within this state.

(b) If the judgment or order directs a corporation, or any of its officers or
 agents, to give to a person adjudged to be a director, stockholder, or member of that corporation a reasonable opportunity to inspect or make copies of the books, papers, or documents of the corporation as the trial court finds that the director, stockholder, or member is entitled by law to inspect or copy.

(c) If a judgment or order adjudges a building or place to be a nuisance and, as part of that judgment or order, directs the closing or discontinuance of any specific use of the building or place for any period of time.

(d) If a judgment or order, including, but not limited to, a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, grants relief in an action brought by a governmental agency under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11225) of Chapter 3 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code or Article 3 (commencing with Section 11570) of Chapter 10 of Division
 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 31, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

917.9.

(a) The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in cases not provided for in Sections 917.1 to 917.8, inclusive, if the trial court, in its discretion, requires an undertaking and the undertaking is not given, in any of the following cases:

(1) Appellant was found to possess money or other property belonging to respondent.

(2) Appellant is required to perform an act for
 respondent’s benefit pursuant to judgment or order under appeal.

(3) The judgment against appellant is solely for costs awarded to the respondent by the trial court pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1021) of Title 14.

(b) The undertaking shall be in a sum fixed by the court and shall be in an amount sufficient to cover all damages which the respondent may sustain by reason of the stay in the enforcement of the judgment or order.

(c) The undertaking shall be in the sum fixed by the court. The undertaking shall be conditioned upon the performance of the judgment or order appealed from or payment of the sums required by the judgment or order appealed from, if the judgment or order is affirmed or the appeal is withdrawn or dismissed, and it shall provide that if the judgment or order appealed from or any
 part of it is affirmed, or the appeal is withdrawn or dismissed, the appellant will pay all damages which the respondent may sustain by reason of the stay in the enforcement of the judgment.

(d) For the purpose of this section, “damages” means either of the following:

(1) Reasonable compensation for the loss of use of the money or property.

(2) Payment of the amounts specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 493, Sec. 3.   Effective September 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

917.10.

(a) The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court, in the absence of an order of the trial court providing otherwise, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) If the trial court has found that a party’s at-large method of election, as that term is defined in Section 14026 of the Elections Code, violates, or is likely to violate, the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 14025) of Division 14 of the Elections Code).

(2) If the trial court has found that a party’s election district boundaries violate, or are likely to violate, the Fair And Inclusive Redistricting for Municipalities And
 Political Subdivisions (FAIR MAPS) Act of 2023 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 21 of the Elections Code).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), enforcement of a judgment or order in the trial court may be stayed upon the perfection of the appeal if the Secretary of State files a certification in the trial court declaring that staying enforcement of a judgment or order pending appeal is necessary for the orderly administration of the state’s elections.

(c) This section does not limit the power of a reviewing court to issue a stay or grant a writ of supersedeas in accordance with Section 923.

(d) If the enforcement of a judgment or order is not stayed pursuant to subdivision (a), the party whose at-large method of election that the trial court found violates, or is likely to violate, the
 California Voting Rights Act of 2001, or the party whose election district boundaries that the trial court found violate, or are likely to violate, the Fair And Inclusive Redistricting for Municipalities And Political Subdivisions (FAIR MAPS) Act of 2023, shall reimburse a county elections official for any actual costs incurred by that elections official in administering elections as a result of the enforcement of the trial court’s judgment or order, and as the result of any orders issued by a court during an appeal of the action.

(e) This section does not apply to a judgment or order entered in a proceeding or action commenced on or before January 1, 2026, that asserts at least one cause of action under the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 or the FAIR MAPS Act of 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 178, Sec. 3.   (AB 1079)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

918.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the trial court may stay the enforcement of any judgment or order.

(b) If the enforcement of the judgment or order would be stayed on appeal only by the giving of an undertaking, a trial court shall not have power, without the consent of the adverse party, to stay the enforcement thereof pursuant to this section for a period which extends for more than 10 days beyond the last date on which a notice of appeal could be filed.

(c) This section applies whether or not an appeal
 will be taken from the judgment or order and whether or not a notice of appeal has been filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 65.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

918.5.

(a) The trial court may, in its discretion, stay the enforcement of a judgment or order if the judgment debtor has another action pending on a disputed claim against the judgment creditor.

(b) In exercising its discretion under this section, the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The likelihood of the judgment debtor prevailing in the other action.

(2) The amount of the judgment of the judgment creditor as compared to the amount
 of the probable recovery of the judgment debtor in the action on the disputed claim.

(3) The financial ability of the judgment creditor to satisfy the judgment if a judgment is rendered against the judgment creditor in the action on the disputed claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 66.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

919.

The trial court may, in its discretion, dispense with or limit the security required by any section in this chapter, when the appellant is an executor, administrator, trustee, guardian, conservator or other person acting in another’s right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

921.

An appeal by a party who has levied an attachment shall not continue in force the attachment, unless an undertaking is executed and filed on the part of the appellant that the appellant will pay all costs and damages which the respondent may sustain by reason of the attachment, in case the order of the court below is sustained in favor of the respondent; and unless, within five days after written notice of the entry of the order appealed from, the appeal is perfected. The amount of the undertaking on appeal required by this section shall be such amount as is fixed by the trial court on motion of the respondent as provided in Section 489.410 and if no
 such order has been made, the undertaking shall be in double the amount of the debt claimed by the appellant. If the respondent is not satisfied with the undertaking in double the amount of the debt or the amount fixed by order under Section 489.410, the trial court upon motion of the respondent made within 60 days after perfecting the appeal may order an increase in the amount of the undertaking in such amount as is justified by the detriment reasonably to be anticipated by continuing the attachment. If such an order is made, the attachment shall be discharged and the property released therefrom, unless the undertaking is executed and filed within 10 days after the order is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 160.)
-------------------------------------------

922.

If an undertaking required or permitted by this title is objected to by the respondent and the court determines the undertaking is insufficient and a sufficient undertaking is not given within the time provided by statute, enforcement of the judgment or order appealed from is no longer stayed and property which has been levied upon under execution issued upon such judgment shall not be released from levy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

923.

The provisions of this chapter shall not limit the power of a reviewing court or of a judge thereof to stay proceedings during the pendency of an appeal or to issue a writ of supersedeas or to suspend or modify an injunction during the pendency of an appeal or to make any order appropriate to preserve the status quo, the effectiveness of the judgment subsequently to be entered, or otherwise in aid of its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

936.1.

An appeal from any judgment or order in any civil commitment or other proceeding wherein the appellant would be entitled to the appointment of counsel on appeal if indigent shall be initiated by the filing of a notice of appeal in conformity with the requirements of Section 1240.1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1385.   Note: Termination clause in Sec. 3.5 of Ch. 1385 was deleted by Stats. 1980, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 14. OF MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS [989. - 1062.34.]



  CHAPTER 1. Proceedings Against Joint Debtors [989. - 994.]

989.

When a judgment is recovered against one or more of several persons, jointly indebted upon an obligation, by proceeding as provided in Section 410.70, those who were not originally served with the summons, and did not appear in the action, may be summoned to appear before the court in which such judgment is entered to show cause why they should not be bound by the judgment, in the same manner as though they had been originally served with the summons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

990.

The summons specified in Section 989 shall be issued by the clerk upon presentation of the affidavit specified in Section 991. The summons must describe the judgment, and require the person summoned to show cause why the person should not be bound by it, and must be served in the same manner, and returnable no later than ninety (90) days after the time specified for the return of the original summons. It is not necessary to file a new complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

991.

The summons must be accompanied by an affidavit of the plaintiff, his agent, representative, or attorney, that the judgment, or some part thereof, remains unsatisfied, and must specify the amount due thereon.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

992.

Upon such summons, the defendant may answer within the time specified therein, denying the judgment, or setting up any defense which may have arisen subsequently; or he may deny his liability on the obligation upon which the judgment was recovered, by reason of any defense existing at the commencement of the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 325.)
-------------------------------------------

993.

If the defendant, in his answer, denies the judgment, or sets up any defense which may have arisen subsequently, the summons, with the affidavit annexed, and the answer, constitute the written allegations in the case; if he denies his liability on the obligation upon which the judgment was recovered, a copy of the original complaint and judgment, the summons, with the affidavit annexed, and the answer, constitute such written allegations, subject to the right of the parties to amend their pleadings as in other cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 325.)
-------------------------------------------

994.

The issues formed may be tried as in other cases; but when the defendant denies, in his answer, any liability on the obligation upon which the judgment was rendered, if a verdict be found against him, it must be for not exceeding the amount remaining unsatisfied on such original judgment, with interest thereon.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bonds and Undertakings [995.010. - 996.560.]



  ARTICLE 1. Preliminary Provisions and Definitions [995.010. - 995.190.]

995.010.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Bond and Undertaking Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.020.

(a) The provisions of this chapter apply to a bond or undertaking executed, filed, posted, furnished, or otherwise given as security pursuant to any statute of this state, except to the extent the statute prescribes a different rule or is inconsistent.

(b) The provisions of this chapter apply to a bond or undertaking given at any of the following times:

(1) On or after January 1, 1983.

(2) Before January 1,
1983, to the extent another surety is substituted for the original surety on or after January 1, 1983, or to the extent the principal gives a new, additional, or supplemental bond or undertaking on or after January 1, 1983.

Except to the extent provided in this section, the law governing a bond or undertaking given before January 1, 1983, is the law applicable to the bond or undertaking immediately before January 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 414 of Chapter 517 of the Statutes of 1982.

(c) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a bail bond or an undertaking of bail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 18.2.   Effective April 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

995.030.

If service of a notice, paper, or other document is required under this chapter, service shall be made in the same manner as service of process in civil actions generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.040.
